Washington statutes.
RCW 23.86.020

Business authorized.

An association created under this chapter, being for mutual welfare, the words "lawful business" shall extend to every kind of lawful effort for business, agricultural, dairy, mercantile, mining, manufacturing or mechanical business, on the cooperative plan.

[ 1913 c 19 s 7; RRS s 3910. Formerly RCW 23.56.020.]